District of Columbia statutes.
21-116

One bond for several wards.

When a person is guardian to a number of persons entitled to shares of the same estate the court may accept one bond instead of separate bonds for each ward, and the bond shall be liable to be sued upon for the use of all or any of the wards as fully as separate bonds might be.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-116.
1973 Ed., § 21-116.